Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-215] Disclosure; other
limitations and conditions on eligibility for benefits. A long-term care
insurance policy or certificate containing any limitations or conditions for
eligibility other than those prohibited in section 431:10H-109 shall set forth
a description of the limitations or conditions, including any required number
of days of confinement, in a separate paragraph of the policy or certificate
and shall be labeled as "Limitations or Conditions on Eligibility of
Benefits". [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next